Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB231.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 909 of the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, is amended to read:Section 909. Petition May Consist of Several Sheets; Statement of Circulator.--Said nomination petition may be on one or more sheets, and different sheets must be used for signers resident in different counties. If more than one sheet is used, they shall be bound together when offered for filing if they are 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 intended to constitute one petition, and each sheet shall be numbered consecutively beginning with number one, at the foot of each page. In cases of petitions for delegate or alternate delegate to National conventions, each sheet shall contain a notation indicating the presidential candidate to whom he is committed or the term "uncommitted." Each sheet shall have appended thereto the statement of the circulator of each sheet, setting forth, subject to the penalties of 18 Pa.C.S. § 4904 (relating to unsworn falsification to authorities)--(a) that he or she is a qualified elector of the Commonwealth, who is duly registered and enrolled as a member of the party designated in said petition, unless said petition relates to the nomination of a candidate for a school district in a district where that office is elective, for a court of common pleas, for the Philadelphia Municipal Court or for justice of the peace, in which event the circulator need not be a duly registered and enrolled member of the designated party; (b) his residence, giving city, borough or township, with street and number, if any; (c) that the signers thereto signed with full knowledge of the contents of the petition; (d) that their respective residences are correctly stated therein; (e) that they all reside in the county named in the statement; (f) that each signed on the date set opposite his name; and (g) that, to the best of the circulator's knowledge and belief, the signers are qualified electors and duly registered and enrolled members of the designated party of the State, or of the political district, as the case may be.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0231PN0184 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728